Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1173.
do enact as follows:AB1173,11Section 1. 449.07 (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB1173,2,22449.07 (title) Disciplinary proceedings and actions.AB1173,23Section 2. 449.07 (2) of the statutes is created to read:AB1173,2,74449.07 (2) The examining board may, in addition to or in lieu of any 5disciplinary action under sub. (1), assess a forfeiture of not more than $1,000 for 6each separate offense against a person who violates sub. (1) (a) to (h). Each day of 7continued violation constitutes a separate offense.AB1173,38Section 3. 449.08 (1) (f) of the statutes is created to read:AB1173,2,159449.08 (1) (f) Failing to release, at no cost to the patient, a copy of the patient’s 10ophthalmic lens prescription or contact lens prescription following release of the 11patient from contact lens fitting and initial follow-up care. The examining board 12shall, by rule, specify requirements for an ophthalmic lens prescription and contact 13lens prescription for purposes this paragraph, but the rules shall require that an 14ophthalmic lens prescription include a measurement of the patient’s pupillary 15distance.AB1173,2,1616